North Carolina statutes. Chapter 8C. Evidence Code.
Article 10. Contents of Writings, Recordings and Photographs.

Rule 1001.
Definitions.

For the purposes of this Article the following definitions are applicable:

Writings and Recordings. — “Writings” and “recordings” consist of letters, words, sounds, or numbers, or their equivalent, set down by handwriting, typewriting, printing, photostating, photographing, magnetic impulse, mechanical or electronic recording, or other form of data compilation.

Photographs. — “Photographs” include still photographs, x-ray films, video tapes, and motion pictures.

Original. — An “original” of a writing or recording is the writing or recording itself or any counterpart intended to have the same effect by a person executing or issuing it. An “original” of a photograph includes the negative or any print therefrom. If data are stored in a computer or similar device, any printout or other output readable by sight, shown to reflect the data accurately, is an “original.”

Duplicate. — A “duplicate” is a counterpart produced by the same impression as the original, or from the same matrix, or by means of photography, including enlargements and miniatures, or by mechanical or electronic re-recording, or by chemical reproduction, or by other equivalent techniques which accurately reproduce the original.

History.

1983, c. 701, s. 1.

Commentary

This rule is identical to Fed. R. Evid. 1001 except that the word “sounds” has been added to paragraph (1) between “words” and “or numbers”.

The Advisory Committee’s Note states:

“Paragraph (1). Traditionally the rule requiring the original centered upon accumulations of data and expressions affecting legal relations set forth in words and figures. This meant that the rule was one essentially related to writings. Present day techniques have expanded methods of storing data, yet the essential form which the information ultimately assumes for usable purposes is words and figures. Hence the considerations underlying the rule dictate its expansion to include computers, photographic systems, and other modern developments.”

Paragraph (1) clarifies North Carolina law by providing that the best evidence rule applies to recordings and photographs. See
Brandis on North Carolina Evidence
§ 190 (1982).

With respect to Paragraph (3), the Advisory Committee’s Note states:

“In most instances, what is an original will be self-evident and further refinement will be unnecessary. However, in some instances particularized definition is required. A carbon copy of a contract executed in duplicate becomes an original, as does a sales ticket carbon copy given to a customer. While strictly speaking the original of a photograph might be thought to be only the negative, practicality and common usage require that any print from the negative be regarded as a original. Similarly, practicality and usage confer the status or original upon any computer printout.”

Paragraph (3) is substantially in accord with North Carolina practice. See
Brandis, supra
, § 190; G.S. 55-37.1 [see now

G.S. 55-16-01

] and G.S. 55A-27.1.

With respect to Paragraph (4), the Advisory Committee’s Note states:

“The definition describes ‘copies’ produced by methods possessing an accuracy which virtually eliminates the possibility of error. Copies thus produced are given the status of originals in large measure by Rule 1003, infra. Copies subsequently produced manually, whether handwritten or typed, are not within the definition. It should be noted that what is an original for some purposes may be a duplicate for others. Thus a bank’s microfilm record of checks cleared is the original as a record. However, a print offered as a copy of a check whose contents are in controversy is a duplicate.”

Rule 1002.
Requirement of original.

To prove the content of a writing, recording, or photograph, the original writing, recording, or photograph is required, except as otherwise provided in these rules or by statute.

History.

1983, c. 701, s. 1.

Commentary

This rule is identical to Fed. R. Evid. 1002.

The rule is the familiar “best evidence rule” expanded to include explicitly writings, recordings, and photographs, as defined in Rule 1001(1) and (2),
supra.
See

Brandis on North Carolina Evidence

§ 190, at 100 (1982). However, the requirement for the original is overridden in many instances by other rules such as Rule 1003, which allows duplicates to be admitted.

The rule in North Carolina is consistent with Rule 1002 in that it requires the original of a writing only when its content is sought to be proved.
Id.

The Advisory Committee’s Note states:

“Application of the rule requires a resolution of the question whether contents are sought to be proved. Thus an event may be proved by nondocumentary evidence, even though a written record of it was made. If, however, the event is sought to be proved by the written record, the rule applies. For example, payment may be proved without producing the written receipt which was given. Earnings may be proved without producing books of account in which they are entered. * * * Nor does the rule apply to testimony that books or records have been examined and found not to contain any reference to a designated matter.

The assumption should not be made that the rule will come into operation on every occasion when use is made of a photograph in evidence. On the contrary, the rule will seldom apply to ordinary photographs. In most instances a party
wishes
to introduce the item and the question raised is the propriety of receiving it in evidence. Cases in which an offer is made of the testimony of a witness as to what he saw in a photograph or motion picture, without producing the same, are most unusual. The usual course is for a witness on the stand to identify the photograph or motion picture as a correct representation of events which he saw or of a scene with which he is familiar. In fact he adopts the picture as his testimony, or, in common parlance, uses the picture to illustrate his testimony. Under these circumstances, no effort is made to prove the contents of the picture, and the rule is inapplicable. * * *

On occasion, however, situations arise in which contents are sought to be proved. Copyright, defamation, and invasion of privacy by photograph or motion picture fall in this category. Similarly as to situations in which the picture is offered as having independent probative value,
e.g.,
automatic photograph of bank robber. * * * The most commonly encountered of this latter group is of course, the X-ray, with substantial authority calling for production of the original.

It should be noted, however, that Rule 703,
supra,
allows an expert to give an opinion based on matters not in evidence, and the present rule must be read as being limited accordingly in its application. Hospital records which may be admitted as business records under Rule 803(6) commonly contain reports interpreting X-rays by the staff radiologist, who qualifies as an expert, and these reports need not be excluded from the records by the instant rule.”

Rule 1003.
Admissibility of duplicates.

A duplicate is admissible to the same extent as an original unless (1) a genuine question is raised as to the authenticity of the original or (2) in the circumstances it would be unfair to admit the duplicate in lieu of the original.

History.

1983, c. 701, s. 1.

Commentary

This rule is identical to Fed. R. Evid. 1003.

Rule 1003 departs from the common law in North Carolina and other jurisdictions by providing that a duplicate is admissible to the same extent as an original unless a genuine question as to the authenticity of the original is raised or it would be unfair to admit the duplicate in the particular case. Traditionally, in North Carolina no special showing has been necessary in order to require production of the original.

The Advisory Committee’s Note states:

“When the only concern is with getting the words or other contents before the court with accuracy and precision, then a counterpart serves equally as well as the original, if the counterpart is the product of a method which insures accuracy and genuineness. By definition in Rule 1001(4),
supra,
a ‘duplicate’ possesses this character. Therefore, if no genuine issue exists as to authenticity and no other reason exists for requiring the original, a duplicate is admissible under the rule. Other reasons for requiring the original may be present when only a part of the original is reproduced and the remainder is needed for cross-examination or may disclose matters qualifying the part offered or otherwise useful to the opposing party.”

Courts should be liberal in permitting questions of genuineness to be raised. The court should examine the quality of the duplicate, the specificity and sincerity of the challenge, the importance of the evidence to the case, and the burdens of producing the original before determining whether a genuine question of authenticity is raised.

Rule 1004.
Admissibility of other evidence of contents.

The original is not required, and other evidence of the contents of a writing, recording, or photograph is admissible if:

Originals Lost or Destroyed. — All originals are lost or have been destroyed, unless the proponent lost or destroyed them in bad faith; or

Original Not Obtainable. — No original can be obtained by any available judicial process or procedure; or

Original in Possession of Opponent. — At a time when an original was under the control of a party against whom offered, he was put on notice, by the pleadings or otherwise, that the contents would be a subject of proof at the hearing, and he does not produce the original at the hearing; or

Collateral Matters. — The writing, recording, or photograph is not closely related to a controlling issue.

History.

1983, c. 701, s. 1.

Commentary

This rule is identical to Fed. R. Evid. 1004.

The Advisory Committee’s Note states:

“Basically the rule requiring the production of the original as proof of contents has developed as a rule of preference: if failure to produce the original is satisfactorily explained, secondary evidence is admissible. The instant rule specifies the circumstances under which production of the original is excused.

The rule recognizes no ‘degrees’ of secondary evidence.”

Paragraph (1) provides that loss or destruction of the original, unless due to bad faith of the proponent, is a satisfactory explanation of nonproduction. See McCormick § 201. This paragraph is consistent with current North Carolina practice. See
Brandis on North Carolina Evidence
§ 192 (1982).

Paragraph (2) provides that when the original is in the possession of a third person, inability to procure it from him by resort to process or other judicial procedure is a sufficient explanation of nonproduction. The Advisory Committee’s Note states that: “Judicial procedure includes subpoena duces tecum as an incident to the taking of a deposition in another jurisdiction. No further showing is required. See McCormick § 202.” Extreme expense and inconvenience in obtaining the document will not constitute unavailability.

Paragraph (3) is consistent with North Carolina practice in that secondary evidence of the contents of a writing is admissible if the opponent who is in possession of the original fails, after notice, to produce it at the trial. See
Brandis on North Carolina Evidence
§ 193 (1982). The Advisory Committee’s Note states:

“A party who has an original in his control has no need for the protection of the rule if put on notice that proof of contents will be made. He can ward off secondary evidence by offering the original. The notice procedure here provided is not to be confused with orders to produce or other discovery procedures, as the purpose of the procedure under this rule is to afford the opposite party an opportunity to produce the original, not to compel him to do so. McCormick § 203.”

Under the rule, notice may be given by the pleadings. There are no North Carolina cases on this point.

Paragraph (4) is consistent with North Carolina cases in that production of the original is not required if the writing is only collaterally involved in the case. See
Brandis on North Carolina Evidence
§ 191 (1982). The Advisory Committee’s Note states:

“While difficult to define with precision, situations arise in which no good purpose is served by production of the original. Examples are the newspaper in an action for the price of publishing defendant’s advertisement,
Foster-Holcomb Investment Co. v. Little Rock Publishing Co.,
151 Ark. 449, 236 S.W. 597 (1922), and the streetcar transfer of plaintiff claiming status as a passenger,

Chicago City Ry. Co. v. Carroll,

206 Ill. 318, 68 N.E. 1087 (1903). Numerous cases are collected in McCormick § 200, p. 412, n. 1.”

Rule 1005.
Public records.

The contents of an official record, or of a document authorized to be recorded or filed and actually recorded or filed, including data compilations in any form, if otherwise admissible, may be proved by copy, certified as correct in accordance with Rule 902 or testified to be correct by a witness who has compared it with the original. If a copy which complies with the foregoing cannot be obtained by the exercise of reasonable diligence, then other evidence of the contents may be given.

History.

1983, c. 701, s. 1.

Commentary

This rule is identical to Fed. R. Evid. 1005.

Admission of certified copies of registered instruments and official records are currently governed by

G.S. 8-18

,

G.S. 8-34

, and

G.S. 1A-1

, Rule 44.

The Advisory Committee’s Note states:

“Public records call for somewhat different treatment. Removing them from their usual place of keeping would be attended by serious inconvenience to the public and to the custodian. As a consequence judicial decisions and statutes commonly hold that no explanation need be given for failure to produce the original of a public record. McCormick § 204; 4 Wigmore §§ 1215-1228. This blanket dispensation from producing or accounting for the original would open the door to the introduction of every kind of secondary evidence of contents of public records were it not for the preference given certified or compared copies. Recognition of degrees of secondary evidence in this situation is an appropriate
quid pro quo
for not applying the requirement of producing the original.”

Rule 1006.
Summaries.

The contents of voluminous writings, recordings, or photographs which cannot conveniently be examined in court may be presented in the form of a chart, summary, or calculation. The originals, or duplicates, shall be made available for examination or copying, or both, by other parties at a reasonable time and place. The court may order that they be produced in court.

History.

1983, c. 701, s. 1.

Commentary

This rule is identical to Fed. R. Evid. 1006.

Where documents are so voluminous that it would be impracticable to produce and examine them in court, North Carolina Courts have allowed a qualified witness to testify to the results of his examination of the documents.
Brandis on North Carolina Evidence
§ 192 (1982).

Rule 1007.
Testimony or written admission of party.

Contents of writings, recordings, or photographs may be proved by the testimony or deposition of the party against whom offered or by his written admission, without accounting for the nonproduction of the original.

History.

1983, c. 701, s. 1.

Commentary

This rule is identical to Fed. R. Evid. 1007.

This rule is consistent with North Carolina practice in that the original writing need not be produced where the opponent admits that the copy offered in evidence is correct. See
Brandis on North Carolina Evidence
§ 192, at 113 (1982). The rule clarifies North Carolina law by not allowing proof of contents by oral evidence of an oral admission. See

Norcum v. Savage,

140 N.C. 472

(1906). The Advisory Committee’s Note states:

“While the parent case, Slatterie v. Pooley, 6 M. & W. 664, 151 Eng. Rep. 579 (Exch. 1840), allows proof of contents by evidence of an oral admission by the party against whom offered, without accounting for nonproduction of the original, the risk of inaccuracy is substantial and the decision is at odds with the purpose of the rule giving preference to the original. See 4 Wigmore § 1255. The instant rule follows Professor McCormick’s suggestion of limiting this use of admissions to those made in the course of giving testimony or in writing. McCormick § 208, p. 424. The limitation, of course, does not call for excluding evidence of an oral admission when nonproduction of the original has been accounted for and secondary evidence generally has become admissible. Rule 1004,
supra.
”

Rule 1008.
Functions of court and jury.

When the admissibility of other evidence of contents of writings, recordings, or photographs under these rules depends upon the fulfillment of a condition of fact, the question whether the condition has been fulfilled is ordinarily for the court to determine in accordance with the provisions of Rule 104. However, when an issue is raised (a) whether the asserted writing ever existed, or (b) whether another writing, recording, or photograph produced at the trial is the original, or (c) whether other evidence of contents correctly reflects the contents, the issue is for the trier of fact to determine as in the case of other issues of fact.

History.

1983, c. 701, s. 1.

Commentary

This rule is identical to Fed. R. Evid. 1008.

The Advisory Committee’s Note states:

“Most preliminary questions of fact in connection with applying the rule preferring the original as evidence of contents are for the judge, under the general principles announced in Rule 104,
supra.
Thus, the question whether the loss of the originals has been established, or of the fulfillment of other conditions specified in Rule 1004,

supra,

is for the judge. However, questions may arise which go beyond the mere administration of the rule preferring the original and into the merits of the controversy. For example, plaintiff offers secondary evidence of the contents of an alleged contract, after first introducing evidence of loss of the original, and defendant counters with evidence that no such contract was ever executed. If the judge decides that the contract was never executed and excludes the secondary evidence, the case is at an end without ever going to the jury on a central issue. Levin, Authentication and Content of Writings, 10 Rutgers L. Rev. 632, 644 (1956). The latter portion of the instant rule is designed to insure treatment of these situations as raising jury questions. The decision is not one for uncontrolled discretion of the jury but is subject to the control exercised generally by the judge over jury determinations. See Rule 104(b),

supra.

”

Although there are no North Carolina cases directly on point, Rule 1008 follows the division of function between the court and the jury with respect to competency and conditional relevancy. See
Brandis on North Carolina Evidence
§ 8 (1982).